Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
4A.

FUNDS
TRANSFERS

PART 1.
SUBJECT MATTER AND DEFINITIONS

§490:4A-101 Short title. This article
may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code -- Funds Transfers. [L 1991, c 41, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next